Hawaii statutes.
[§461J-10.14] Exemption from
continuing competence requirements. (a) Prior to the expiration of a
renewal period, a licensee may submit a written request to the board for an
exemption from the continuing competence requirements in this chapter.

(b) The request for an exemption shall include
the following information:

(1) Evidence that, during the two-year period prior
to the expiration of the license, the licensee was residing in another country
for one year or longer, reasonably preventing completion of the continuing
competence requirements;

(2) Evidence that, during the two-year period prior
to the expiration of the license, the licensee was ill or disabled for one year
or longer as documented by a licensed physician, surgeon, or clinical psychologist,
preventing completion of the continuing competence requirements; or

(3) Evidence that, during the two-year period
prior to the expiration of the license, a dependent family member of the
licensee was ill or disabled for one year or longer as documented by a licensed
physician, surgeon, or clinical psychologist, preventing completion of the
continuing competence requirements.

(c) The above exemptions shall not be granted
for more than one renewal period. In the event a licensee cannot complete the continuing
competence requirements during the two-year period after receiving an
exemption, the licensee may only renew the license on an inactive status.

(d) When a licensee is absent from the State
because of military service for a period of one year or longer during the
two-year renewal period, preventing completion of the continuing competence
requirement, the board may provide an exemption from the continuing competence
requirement for more than one renewal period. [L 2013, c 35, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next